Hawaii statutes.
§241-4.8 High technology business
investment tax credit. (a) The high technology business investment tax
credit provided under section 235-110.9 shall be operative for this chapter on
July 1, 1999.

(b) For investments made on or after May 1,
2009, this section shall be subject to section 235-109.5. [L 1999, c 178, §26;
am L 2009, c 178, §6]

Note

The 2009 amendment applies to investments made, renovation
costs incurred, or eligible depreciable tangible property placed in service on
or after May 1, 2009. L 2009, c 178, §10.

Revision Note

"July 1, 1999" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next